Illinois, session 104th, SB1692.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Government Retirement Plan Responsibility Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. In this Act:7    "Retirement plan" means an eligible plan under Section 457 8or Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. 9    Section 10. Retirement plans. A retirement plan offered by 10a unit of local government or school district must comply with 11the applicable provisions of Article 1 of the Illinois Pension 12Code, including, but not limited to, provisions concerning 13fiduciary duties, funding, investments, and the rights of 14participants, regardless of whether the retirement plan is 15established under the Illinois Pension Code.